Utah statutes.
32A-9-104.   Duties of commission and department before issuing licenses.
(1)  Before any warehousing license is issued by the commission, the
department shall conduct an investigation for the purpose of gathering
information and making recommendations to the commission as to the issuance of
the license.  The information shall be forwarded to the commission to aid in
its determination.
(2)  Before issuing any warehousing license, the commission shall:
(a)  determine that the applicant has complied with all license qualifications
and requirements for making application for a license, as provided by Sections
32A-9-102 and  32A-9-103, and that the application is complete;
(b)  consider the applicant's ability to properly utilize the warehousing
license within the restrictions of this title and the commission rules
including, but not limited to, the types of any products other than liquor
that the applicant is presently warehousing, the brands of liquor the
applicant intends to warehouse, and the means the applicant intends to use to
distribute the liquor;
(c)  consider the physical characteristics of the premises where it is
proposed that liquor be warehoused, such as location, proximity to
transportation, and condition, size, and security of the premises; and
(d)  consider any other factors or circumstances it considers necessary.
